District of Columbia statutes.
7-630

Effect of subchapter.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to condone, authorize, or approve mercy-killing or to permit any affirmative or deliberate act or omission to end a human life other than to permit the natural process of dying as provided in this subchapter.

Feb. 25, 1982, D.C. Law 4-69, § 11, 28 DCR 5047
1981 Ed., § 6-2430.
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 2 to 4 of Mandatory Autopsy for Deceased Wards of the District of Columbia and Mandatory Unusual Incident Report Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-70, February 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2280).
For temporary (90 day) provisions for mandatory autopsies and unusual incident reports, see § 2 of Mandatory Autopsy for Deceased Wards of the District of Columbia and Mandatory Unusual Incident Report Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-25, April 2, 2001, 48 DCR 3320).
For temporary (90 day) provisions for mandatory autopsies and unusual reports, see § 2 of Mandatory Autopsy for Deceased Wards of the District of Columbia and Mandatory Unusual Incident Report Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-151, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10204).
For temporary (90 day) provisions for mandatory autopsies and unusual incident reports, see §§ 2 to 5 of Mandatory Autopsy for Deceased Wards of the District of Columbia and Mandatory Unusual Incident Report Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-261, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1437).